Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.193.900

Effective date—1998 c 244 ss 1-9 and 11-15.

Sections 1 through 9 and 11 through 15 of this act are necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and take effect immediately [March 30, 1998].

[ 1998 c 244 s 17.]